Utah statutes.
41-12a-404.   Limitation on cancellation of coverage specified in certificate.

When an insurer has certified an insurance policy under Sections 41-12a-402 or 41-12a-403, the policy may not be terminated unless notice of termination is filed with the department no later than 10 days after termination. However, this type of policy which is subsequently procured and certified shall, on the effective date of its certificate, terminate the insurance previously certified.

